Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-533
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; policy; hearing; review.

The policy required by section 79-531 shall be developed with input from parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers and shall be the subject of a public hearing before the school board or board of education of the school district before adoption by the board. The policy shall be reviewed annually and either altered and adopted as altered or reaffirmed by the board following a public hearing. Any public hearing under this section shall include a reasonable opportunity for public comments.

Laws 1994, LB 1161, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,245;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 286;

Laws 2024, LB71, § 4.
July 19, 2024